Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 8. Program Administration Fee.

Sec. 06.60.800.
Authorization of program administration fee.

The department may collect a program administration fee of $10 for each mortgage loan transaction to reimburse the state for the cost of administering this chapter.

The program administration fee shall be paid by a borrower who is providing real property as security for the mortgage loan, except that, if the regulations of a federal or state loan program that insures the loan and that applies to the mortgage loan transaction prohibits the borrower from paying the program administration fee, another party to the mortgage loan transaction shall pay the program administration fee.

If there are multiple mortgage loan instruments recorded for a single mortgage loan transaction, the department shall collect only one program administration fee.

The program administration fees collected under this section shall be separately accounted for and may be appropriated by the legislature to the department for the operation of this chapter.

In this section, “mortgage loan instrument” means a deed of trust, mortgage, or another loan instrument recorded to encumber residential real property in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 77 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e); relettered in 2010, at which time subsection (d) was relettered as (e).

Sec. 06.60.810.
Payment and use of fees. [Repealed, § 87 ch 61 SLA 2010.]